test/src/morphology/V-swimama63_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `sõimama: # Verb (63) `sõimama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `sõimama+V+Inf/mA: `sõimama
     `sõimama+V+Inf: sõimadaq
     `sõimama+V+ActPrtPrc: sõimanuq
     `sõimama+V+PssPrtPrc: sõimat
     `sõimama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: `sõima
     `sõimama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: `sõimas
     `sõimama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `sõimssi
     `sõimama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: sõimaú
